Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-902
Department of Correctional Services; seal; certification of documents.

The Department of Correctional Services shall adopt a seal. Copies of all records or other instruments in the department, when certified by the department as true copies and bearing the seal thereof, shall be received in any court as prima facie evidence of the original records or instruments.

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 54.